Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. Commissioners

§ 41-11-201.
Appointment of commissioners to serve on joint commission; ratification of compacts; governor may serve as commissioner.

The governor of the state of Wyoming shall appoint any commissioners necessary to represent Wyoming on any joint commission to be composed of commissioners from Wyoming and one (1) or more adjoining states and an authorized representative of the United States for the purpose of negotiating compacts or agreements between those states, or between those states and the United States, respecting the equitable division, use and distribution of the waters of any interstate stream and its tributaries flowing from or into Wyoming. However, any such compact or agreement so entered into by the specified states, or between those states and the United States, is not binding or obligatory upon any of the compacting parties thereto unless it has been ratified and approved by the legislature of each of the party states and consented to by the congress of the United States.

At his option, the governor may serve as one (1) of the commissioners for Wyoming in negotiating any compact or agreement respecting the equitable division, use and distribution of the waters of any interstate stream and its tributaries flowing from or into Wyoming.

The governor may remove any commissioner he appoints under this section as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 64, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-481; Laws 1965, ch. 177, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 41-11-202.
Designation of commissioners to represent state on all interstate compacts; service of governor on compact commission.

The governor of Wyoming shall appoint and designate such commissioners as may be necessary to represent the state of Wyoming on all negotiated interstate compacts, unless the compacts by their terms otherwise provide. The governor of Wyoming, at his option, may serve as a commissioner for Wyoming on any compact commission, if permitted under the terms of the compact. The governor may remove any commissioner he appoints as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 64, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-482; Laws 1965, ch. 177, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interstate compacts relative to water generally, see §§

41-12-101

through

41-12-801

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Legal Problems in Changing Uses or Coordinating Uses of Keyhole Reservoir,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1974).

§ 41-11-203.
Authority of commissioners; investigations.

Any commissioner appointed to serve under the provisions of any interstate water compact or in the negotiation of an interstate water compact or any other person designated by the governor to do so, shall have full authority to make any and all investigations of such interstate streams and the drainage area thereof which may become necessary in order to sufficiently advise him of the physical conditions obtaining upon such system, and of the present and future needs of the state of Wyoming, and its citizens to the use and benefits of the waters of such stream. To that end the governor or any commissioner or other person designated by the governor to conduct such investigation, shall have authority to administer oaths, examine and require the attendance of witnesses, and to perform such other duties as may be necessary to sufficiently apprise him of the facts and furnish him with adequate information in order that he may properly perform his duties as the representative of the state of Wyoming or to fully inform the designated representative of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 102, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-2603; W.S. 1957, § 41-483; Laws 1965, ch. 177, § 3.

Cross references. —

For authority of commissioner to delegate authority to assistant commissioner, see §

41-11-204

.

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

§ 41-11-204.
Assistant commissioners.

The governor may appoint assistant commissioners to aid and assist him, or any interstate streams commissioner appointed by him, in the negotiations for determination of the equitable division of the waters of all Wyoming interstate streams, to serve only on call of the governor.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 102, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-2604; Laws 1957, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-484; Laws 1965, ch. 177, § 4.

§ 41-11-205.
Mileage, per diem and compensation for commissioners and assistant commissioners.

Each and every commissioner and assistant commissioner appointed to represent the state of Wyoming on an interstate compact or in the negotiation thereof shall be paid per diem and compensation in the same amount as provided for members of the Wyoming legislature and mileage at the rate set in W.S.

9-3-103

for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in the performance of his duties except state of Wyoming officers and employees shall only be reimbursed for mileage and per diem while away from their regular stations, as in other cases provided. The state engineer is charged with the responsibility for expenditure of such sums as are necessary under this act [§§

41-11-201

through

41-11-206

].

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-485; Laws 1965, ch. 177, § 5; 1975, ch. 141, § 1.

§ 41-11-206.
Depository of records relating to interstate streams and water compacts.

The office of the state engineer is hereby designated as the depository of all records, reports and materials relating to interstate streams and water compacts and the activities of all commissioners, administrators and other persons appointed by the governor to conduct investigations of any Wyoming interstate streams or water.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 177, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-485.1.